Tennessee statutes. Title 44 Animals And Animal Husbandry
Part 1

General Provisions

44-2-101. Chapter definitions.

As used in this chapter, unless the context otherwise requires:

“Animal” or “animals” means all domestic animals including, but not limited to, cattle, bison, all equidae, sheep, goats, swine, dogs, cats, all avian species, and all Class III animals as established by § 70-4-403;

“Commissioner” means the commissioner of agriculture;

“Department” means the Tennessee department of agriculture;

“Disease” means any communicable disease deemed appropriate for regulatory control measures by the state veterinarian;

“Person” means an individual, corporation, partnership and any association of two (2) or more persons having a joint or common interest; and

“USDA” means the United States department of agriculture.

Acts 1993, ch. 109, § 1; T.C.A. §44-2-1301.

Compiler's Notes. Former part 1, §§44-2-101 —44-2-123 (Acts 1881, ch. 101, §§ 1, 2; 1885 (E.S.), ch. 17, §§ 1, 2; 1889, ch. 268, §§ 1, 2; 1895, ch. 168, §§ 1, 2; 1897, ch. 42, §§ 1, 5, 6; 1897, ch. 51, § 1; 1901, ch. 156, §§ 1, 5-13; 1905, ch. 152, § 1; 1907, ch. 68, §§ 2-4; 1907, ch. 428, § 1; 1909, ch. 85, § 1; 1913, ch. 5, § 1; 1913, ch. 14, § 1; 1913, ch. 16, § 1; Shan. §§ 2788, 2789, 2789a1, 2789a5-2789a13, 2789a15, 2815, 2816, 2838, 2839, 2839a1, 2839a2; Acts 1927, ch. 7, §§ 1, 2; Code 1932, §§ 5019-5021, 5025-5035, 5059-5064; Acts 1939, ch. 40, § 1; 1947, ch. 46, § 1; Acts 1968, ch. 409, §§ 1-3; 1971, ch. 313, § 1; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), §§ 44-401, 44-405 — 44-415, 44-422 — 44-432; Acts 1989, ch. 591, § 113), which contained general provisions pertaining to animal health regulation, was repealed by Acts 1993, ch. 109, § 1.

Textbooks. Tennessee Jurisprudence, 2 Tenn. Juris., Animals, § 31.

Law Reviews.

The Standard of Care for Veterinarians in Medical Malpractice Claims (Joseph H. King, Jr.), 58 Tenn. L. Rev. 1 (1990).

Collateral References. 4 Am. Jur. 2d Animals §§ 32, 33.

3A C.J.S. Animals §§ 66, 67.

Communicable disease, sale of livestock inflicted with. 14 A.L.R.4th 1096.

Construction of provisions of statute or ordinance governing occasion, time, or manner of summary destruction of domestic animals by public authorities. 42 A.L.R.4th 839.

Animals
4.

44-2-102. Supervisory powers.

The commissioner and the state veterinarian have the general supervision of all animals within or that may be in transit through the state, and they are empowered to:

Establish a quarantine against any animal or animals within or entering the state;

Enter any premises in which animals are likely kept for the purpose of examining, inspecting or testing for the purpose of disease control;

Prohibit or regulate the importation of animals into this state whenever it is necessary to protect the health of animals in Tennessee;

Order tests or vaccinations of animals within the state or imported into the state for the purpose of protecting the health of animals in Tennessee;

Order the destruction and sanitary disposition of any animal, whenever, in the opinion of the state veterinarian, the interests of the state are best served by the destruction of that animal. This destruction may be ordered only for control of any animal disease for which the state has a control program, or for any animal disease not known to exist in the United States;

Order the sanitary disposition of any dead animal. The owner of such animal shall be liable for its disposition;

Stop and inspect or examine vehicles likely to be hauling animals for the purposes of disease control and determining compliance with this chapter;

Order the cleaning and disinfection of any premises, vehicle or equipment for the purpose of animal disease control;

Promulgate in accordance with the Uniform Administrative Procedures Act, compiled in title 4, chapter 5, all rules and regulations necessary to carry out this chapter;

Impose in accordance with the Uniform Administrative Procedures Act, compiled in title 4, chapter 5, civil penalties of up to one thousand dollars ($1,000) for each violation of this chapter or the rules and regulations promulgated under this chapter;

Cooperate with the government of the United States and may designate employees of USDA as agents of the department in carrying out the purposes of this chapter;

Call upon other law enforcement agencies for assistance when the public safety and welfare is threatened; and

File suit in a court of competent jurisdiction for the purpose of enjoining the further violation of this chapter.

Acts 1993, ch. 109, § 1; T.C.A. §44-2-1302.

Textbooks. Tennessee Jurisprudence, 2 Tenn. Juris., Animals, §§ 31, 38.

44-2-103. Prohibited acts.

It is unlawful for any person to:

Willfully hinder, obstruct, disregard or evade any quarantine or order the commissioner or state veterinarian may issue under this chapter;

Distribute, sell or use any veterinary vaccine, antiserum, or diagnostic antigen or other veterinary biologic products unless licensed by the USDA and permitted by the department;

Refuse to allow the commissioner or the state veterinarian or any person acting under the commissioner's or state veterinarian's authority to inspect or examine any animal reported or suspected to be infected with any communicable disease, or for the owner of such animals to fail to present them for testing or to fail to render reasonable assistance in testing of the animals;

Knowingly sell, trade or import into this state any animal or animals infected with a communicable disease; or

Violate any rule or regulation promulgated pursuant to this chapter.

Acts 1993, ch. 109, § 1; T.C.A. §44-2-1303.

44-2-104. Penalties.

A violation of this chapter is a Class A misdemeanor.

Acts 1993, ch. 109, § 1; T.C.A. §44-2-1304.

Cross-References. Penalty for Class A misdemeanors, §40-35-111.

44-2-105. Indemnity for destroyed animals.

The commissioner through rules and regulations may establish procedures for the payment of indemnities for animals destroyed under authority of this chapter. Indemnity under this section is not intended to be a full reimbursement but a partial compensation based on, but not limited to, the value of the animal and the availability of funds for that purpose. Indemnification may be disallowed in cases where the owner is in violation of this chapter.

Acts 1993, ch. 109, § 1; T.C.A. §44-2-1305.

44-2-106. Federally accredited veterinarians — Inspections, vaccinations and tests.

Veterinarians accredited under Title 9 of the Code of Federal Regulations and licensed by the state board of veterinary medical examiners may be authorized to make necessary inspections, vaccinations, and tests required by this chapter or its regulations.

Acts 1993, ch. 109, § 1; T.C.A. §44-2-1306.